Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB46.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Eight Can't Wait Policy to Prevent Excessive Force Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds that:(1) The authority of law enforcement officers and school security personnel to use physical force is a serious responsibility that must be exercised judiciously, with respect for human rights, dignity and the sanctity of every human life.(2) Every individual has a right to be free from excessive use of force by law enforcement officers and school security personnel acting under color of law.123456789101112131415161718 (3) Through enactment of a model policy the Commonwealth can implement common-sense policing standards that can prevent excessive force being used against our residents and in our communities.(4) The law and policy created must be carefully constructed and in a manner that thoughtfully reflects the gravity of the serious consequences that excessive force by law enforcement officers and school security personnel can have.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chokehold." A physical maneuver that restricts an individual's ability to breathe for the purpose of incapacitation."Commission." The Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission of the Commonwealth."Commissioner." The Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police."Community-based organization." A grassroots organization that monitors the issue of police misconduct and reform measures and has a national presence and membership. The term includes the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People, the American Civil Liberties Union and UnidosUS."Deadly force." Force which, under the circumstances in which it is used, is readily capable of causing death or serious bodily injury."Force." Efforts used by a law enforcement officer that may result in serious bodily injury or death when used to:20250SB0046PN0019 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) effectuate an arrest;(2) overcome resistance or threatened resistance to effectuate an arrest; or(3) protect the law enforcement officer or any other individual from injury or death."Law enforcement agency." A law enforcement agency in this Commonwealth that is the employer of a law enforcement officer."Law enforcement officer." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "peace officer" under 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions)."Professional law enforcement association." A law enforcement membership association that works for the needs of state or local law enforcement agencies. The term includes the International Association of Chiefs of Police, the National Sheriffs' Association, the Fraternal Order of Police and the National Association of School Resource Officers."Reasonable alternatives." Tactics and methods used by a law enforcement officer or school security personnel to effectuate an arrest or detainment that do not unreasonably increase the risk posed to the law enforcement officer or another individual, including verbal communication, distance, warnings, de-escalation tactics and techniques, tactical repositioning and other tactics and techniques intended to stabilize the situation and reduce the immediacy of the risk so that more time, options and resources can be called upon to resolve the situation without the use of a firearm, taser, explosive device, chemical agent, baton, impact projectile, blunt instrument, hand, fist, foot, canine or vehicle against an individual."School entity." The term shall have the same meaning as defined under section 1301-C of the act of March 10, 1949 20250SB0046PN0019 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."School police officer." As defined under section 1301-C of the Public School Code of 1949."School resource officer." As defined under section 1301-C of the Public School Code of 1949."School security guard." As defined under section 1301-C of the Public School Code of 1949."School security personnel." School police officers, school resource officers and school security guards."Serious bodily injury." Bodily injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious, permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member or organ.Section 4. Statewide model policy.(a) Development.--Within 120 days of the effective date of this section, the Attorney General, in consultation with the commissioner, the commission, law enforcement agencies, professional law enforcement associations and community-based organizations shall promulgate a Statewide model policy to prevent excessive force by law enforcement officers and school security personnel within this Commonwealth. The Attorney General shall seek public comment at least 20 days prior to finalizing the Statewide model policy.(b) Notification.--The Attorney General shall:(1) Publicly and conspicuously post the promulgated Statewide model policy on the Attorney General's publicly accessible Internet website and provide notice of the promulgation to the commissioner, the commission, law enforcement agencies, professional law enforcement associations and community-based organizations with whom the 20250SB0046PN0019 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Attorney General consulted.(2) Notify and supply a copy of the policy to the Governor and the General Assembly.(c) Adoption.--(1) Sixty days following the promulgation of the Statewide model policy by the Attorney General, except as provided under paragraph (2), each law enforcement agency and school entity shall adopt the Statewide model policy as a written policy governing the procedures that law enforcement officers and school security personnel shall comply with when engaging with individuals, including bringing an incident under control, making an arrest or protecting the officers, security personnel or others.(2) A law enforcement agency or school entity may develop and adopt a written policy provided the policy developed contains, at a minimum, the components specified in subsection (f).(3) The Statewide model policy shall serve as a minimum standard by which other policies are developed and reviewed. The commission shall compile a list of all law enforcement agencies and school entities that are required to adopt a written policy under this section.(4) A law enforcement agency and school entity shall certify to the commission compliance with this section and provide the commission with a copy of the adopted policy.(5) The commission shall review each adopted policy to determine if the policy meets the minimum standards required. The commission shall notify the Attorney General of any law enforcement agency or school entity that has failed to comply with this section.20250SB0046PN0019 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Failure to comply.--If a law enforcement agency or school entity fails to adopt a written policy as required under subsection (c), the law enforcement agency or school entity risks revocation or suspension of State-appropriated money. The Attorney General shall notify the Governor and the General Assembly of a law enforcement agency or school entity that fails to comply.(e) Periodic review and training.--At least every two years, the Attorney General shall review and update the Statewide model policy as may be required. At least annually, the commissioner and the commission shall review the training programs, for which each is responsible, and ensure that law enforcement officers and school security personnel receive training that is consistent with the Statewide model policy.(f) Components of policy.--(1) The Statewide model policy developed shall, at a minimum:(i) Require the use of de-escalation tactics and techniques before using force.(ii) Develop a force continuum or matrix that defines and limits the types of force and specific weapons that can be used to respond to specific levels of resistance.(iii) Ban chokeholds and strangleholds, including carotid restraints.(iv) Require a verbal warning be given, when possible, before using deadly force.(v) Prohibit shooting at individuals in moving vehicles unless the individual poses a deadly threat by means other than the vehicle.20250SB0046PN0019 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) Require the exhaustion of all reasonable alternatives before resorting to using deadly force.(vii) Establish a duty to intervene and stop other law enforcement officers or school security personnel from using excessive force, as well as immediately reporting incidents to a supervisor.(viii) Require reporting of uses of force, including when force was threatened or attempted but not used.(2) The policy developed must provide for the consistent definition and use of the following terms:(i) "De-escalation tactics and techniques."(ii) "Duty to intervene."(iii) "Excessive force."(iv) Any other term that may require clarification to ensure uniform understanding and use.Section 5. Applicability.This act applies to all law enforcement officers and school security personnel within the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth.Section 6. Exclusive jurisdiction.The Supreme Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear any challenge to or to render a declaratory judgment concerning the constitutionality of this act. The Supreme Court is authorized to take such action as it deems appropriate, consistent with the Supreme Court retaining jurisdiction, to find facts or to expedite a final judgment in connection with such a challenge or request for declaratory relief.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0046PN0019 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728